District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.04

Repealed

Abandonment or readjustment of streets to provide ground for educational, religious, or similar institutions.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 712, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-113.